Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.269

After dissolution under RCW 25.15.265.

(1) After dissolution occurs under RCW 25.15.265, the limited liability company may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a certificate of dissolution.

(2) A certificate of dissolution filed under subsection (1) of this section must set forth:

(a) The name of the limited liability company; and

(b) A statement that the limited liability company is dissolved under RCW 25.15.265.

[ 2015 c 188 s 52.]